Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
CHAPTER 3 Conservators of Minors

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 325 (2012).